New York, session 2025-2026, A1555.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 37-0123 to read as follows: 3 § 37-0123. Prohibition of nonemergency application of pesticide or lawn 4 care pesticide. 5 1. No person, firm, partnership, association, limited liability compa- 6 ny, corporation, municipality or government entity shall allow or imple- 7 ment the nonemergency application of pesticide or lawn care pesticide in 8 any municipal park lands and lands under the jurisdiction of the state 9 office of parks, recreation and historic preservation. 10 2. Prior to any application of pesticide or lawn care pesticide, the 11 office shall provide public notice at least seventy-two hours prior to 12 such application. Such public notice shall remain posted on the premise 13 and on any internet web site operated by the office for seventy-two 14 hours. 15 3. For the purposes of this section: 16 (a) "pesticide" means a fungicide used on plants, an insecticide, a 17 herbicide or a rodenticide, but does not mean a sanitizer, disinfectant, 18 antimicrobial agent or pesticide bait in a tamper resistant container; 19 (b) "lawn care pesticide" means a pesticide registered by the United 20 States Environmental Protection Agency and labeled pursuant to the 21 federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act for use in lawn, 22 garden and ornamental sites or areas, but shall not include any: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03137-01-5 A. 1555 2 1 (1) microbial pesticide or biochemical pesticide that is registered 2 with the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or 3 (2) a pesticide classified by the United States Environmental 4 Protection Agency as an exempt material under 40 CFR 152.25; 5 (c) "microbial pesticide" means a pesticide that consists of a 6 microorganism as the active ingredient; and 7 (d) "biochemical pesticide" means a naturally occurring substance that 8 controls pests by nontoxic mechanisms. 9 4. The department is authorized to promulgate such rules and regu- 10 lations as it shall deem necessary to implement the provisions of this 11 section. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.